District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.06

Restrictions relating to pharmacies.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter regulating the practice of pharmacy shall be construed as altering or affecting in any way District or federal laws requiring a written prescription for controlled substances or other dangerous drugs.

(b)

(1)

No pharmacist shall supervise more than 1 pharmacy intern at a time without prior approval of the Board of Pharmacy.

(2)

No one other than a licensed pharmacist shall receive an oral prescription for Schedule II controlled substances.

(3)

It shall be unlawful for a pharmacy intern to compound or dispense any drug by prescription in the District except while in the presence of and under the immediate supervision of a pharmacist.

(4)

Any person engaging in the practice of pharmacy as a pharmacy intern shall register with the Mayor and shall comply with the applicable provisions of this chapter and subpart C of subchapter IV of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

(c)

Consistent with maintaining patient safety, no pharmacist shall supervise more pharmacy technicians and trainees than he or she can safely supervise. The pharmacist shall be fully responsible for the practice of each technician and trainee during the period of supervision and may be subject to disciplinary action for any violation of this chapter by a technician or trainee he or she supervises.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1006, 33 DCR 729
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(f), 60 DCR 2711

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3310.6.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added (c).